Massachusetts, session 194th, H4197.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Amend Chapter 138 by adding the following at the end thereof:
Section 79. All licensees for alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises shall list the
alcohol by volume for each beer selection on their menu.
of 1